Maryland, session 2026, SB0877.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
– 1 –

Ch. 569 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(e) (6) From the fines collected by Baltimore City or the District Court as a
result of violations enforced by a stop sign monitoring system located in Baltimore City,
50% shall be:
(i) Distributed to the local management board for Baltimore City;
and
(ii) 1. From the fines collected as a result of violations enforced
by a stop sign monitoring system located in the 45th legislative district, used only for
providing youth programming and services for youth living in or attending a school located
in the 45th legislative district; [or]
2. From the fines collected as a result of violations enforced
by a stop sign monitoring system located in the 46th legislative district, used only for
providing youth programming and services for youth living in or attending a school located
in the 46th legislative district; OR
3. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED AS A RESULT OF
VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE MT.
WASHINGTON NEIGHBORHOOD LOCATED IN THE 41ST LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT, USED
ONLY FOR PROVIDING YOUTH PROGRAMMING AND SERVICES FOR YOUTH LIVING IN
OR ATTENDING A SCHOOL LOCATED IN THE 41ST LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
Article – Transportation
21–707.1.
(a) This section applies only in:
(1) Prince George’s County[, the];
(2) THE MT. WASHINGTON NEIGHBORHOOD IN THE 41ST
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT IN BALTIMORE CITY;
(3) THE 45th 41ST, 45TH, and 46th Legislative Districts in Baltimore
City[,]; and [the]
(4) (3) THE City of Takoma Park.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means a law enforcement agency that is authorized to issue a
citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic laws or regulations.
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 569
(3) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or lessee
of a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
(4) “Recorded image” means images recorded by a stop sign monitoring
system:
(i) On:
1. Two or more photographs;
2. Two or more microphotographs;
3. Two or more electronic images;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing a motor vehicle and, on at least one image or portion of
tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
(5) “Stop sign monitoring system” means a device designed to capture a
recorded image of a violation.
(6) (i) “Violation” means a failure to come to a complete stop at a stop
sign in violation of § 21–707 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Violation” does not include any action a driver is instructed to
take by a police officer.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection, an agency may
use stop sign monitoring systems:
(i) On highways located in a school zone maintained by a local
jurisdiction, if authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction; or
(ii) On State highways located in a school zone, if authorized by the
State Highway Administration.
– 3 –

Ch. 569 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) A stop sign monitoring system:
(i) May not be used in a local jurisdiction under this section unless
its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction by local law enacted
after reasonable notice and a public hearing; and
(ii) In Prince George’s County, may only be used at a location
approved by the Prince George’s County Council.
(3) Prince George’s County shall prioritize the placement of stop sign
monitoring systems within municipalities that have high violation rates.
(4) Before beginning use of stop sign monitoring systems, an agency shall
publish notice that the agency has adopted the use of stop sign monitoring systems on its
website and, in Baltimore City and Prince George’s County only, in a newspaper of general
circulation in the jurisdiction in which the stop sign monitoring system will be used.
(5) (i) A local jurisdiction that implements a stop sign monitoring
system shall prominently place signs on highways within the local jurisdiction providing
notice that stop sign monitoring systems are used in the local jurisdiction.
(ii) The State Highway Administration shall place signs prominently
providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are in use on State highways.
Chapter 571 of the Acts of 2025
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2027, the Baltimore City Department of Transportation and the City of Takoma Park,
respectively, shall each report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly on:
(1) through October 1, 2027:
(i) the time period during which stop sign monitoring systems were
in use in the local jurisdiction; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by a stop sign monitoring system in the local jurisdiction over the
reported time period, by location and date;
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating stop sign
monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by stop sign monitoring systems;
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 569
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of stop sign monitoring
systems;
(4) the performance and reliability of stop sign monitoring systems used by
the local jurisdiction; and
(5) the effectiveness of stop sign monitoring systems in reducing violations,
crashes, and pedestrian injuries in the local jurisdiction and in areas where the stop sign
monitoring systems were implemented and used.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and, at the end of June 30, 2029,
this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and
of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 12, 2026.
– 5 –